Louisiana, session 2026, HB677.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 41:909 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§909. Tensas Parish School Board; sale or exchange of school lands
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the Tensas
Parish School Board, on behalf of the state of Louisiana, determines that any school
land, including but not limited to sixteenth section lands, school indemnity lands, or
other immovable property located in Tensas Parish and as more specifically
described in any agreements entered into and documents executed by the Tensas
Parish School Board, is no longer needed for school purposes and that the best
interest of the Tensas Parish school system would be served by the sale or exchange
of such land, the school board may sell such lands or exchange it for other lands in
Tensas Parish in accordance with this Section.
B. The Tensas Parish School Board shall obtain an appraisal of the land to
be sold or exchanged from a certified, licensed appraiser and such appraisal shall be
available for public inspection.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 677 ENROLLED
C. If land is exchanged, the total consideration received by the Tensas Parish
School Board, including the value of land received, shall be of equal or greater value
than the land that the Tensas Parish School Board is to relinquish or exchange.
D. The Tensas Parish School Board shall reserve to the state all mineral
rights and interests as required by law.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.